Idaho, session 2026, S1277.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 55-618, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-618. INTERNAL ACCESSORY DWELLING UNITS -- RESTRICTIVE COVENANTS
PROHIBITED. (1) On and after July 1, 2023 2026, no restrictive covenant may
be entered into that prohibits an internal or unreasonably restricts ac-
cessory dwelling unit units, as defined in section 55-3212 67-6541, Idaho
Code. Any such covenant is hereby declared to be against public policy and
is void and unenforceable. Any person attempting to create or enforce such a
covenant shall be liable for any attorney's fees, court costs, and any other
damages incurred by the other party. The provisions of this section shall
not be construed to protect more than one (1) internal accessory dwelling
unit per homestead.
(2) This section does not apply to a restrictive covenant against
internal accessory dwelling units entered into prior to July 1, 2023 2026.
SECTION 2. That Section 55-3212, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-3212. INTERNAL ACCESSORY DWELLING UNITS. (1) No covenant, condi-
tion, or restriction may be added, amended, or enforced by a homeowner's
association or any other parties in such a way that strictly prohibits
internal or unreasonably restricts accessory dwelling units, as defined in
subsection (3) of this section 67-6541, Idaho Code. The provisions of this
section shall not be construed to protect more than one (1) internal acces-
sory dwelling unit per homestead.
(2) Notwithstanding the prohibitions provided in subsection (1) of
this section, a homeowner's association may adopt reasonable rules govern-
ing the use of internal accessory dwelling units otherwise allowed by law,
including but not limited to size limits, height limits, setback require-
ments, open space requirements, parking controls, and bedroom requirements.
(3)(a) An "internal accessory dwelling unit" means a self-contained
living unit that:


(i) Includes its own cooking, sleeping, and sanitation facili-
ties;
(ii) Is located within a detached, owner-occupied homestead, as
defined in section 63-701, Idaho Code, or such homestead's at-
tached or detached garage; and
(iii) Is used for the purpose of housing relatives of the owner of
the homestead or for the purpose of renting to a residential tenant
for a period exceeding thirty (30) days.
(b) An internal accessory dwelling unit does not include an alternative
detached structure, motor home, camper, recreational vehicle, tiny
home on wheels, or other such similar dwellings on wheels.
(4) (3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict a home-
owner's association from adopting a less restrictive definition of acces-
sory dwelling units.
(5) (4) The provisions of this section do not apply to any rentals de-
fined in section 63-1803(4), Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6541, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6541. ACCESSORY DWELLING UNITS. (1) No county, city, health dis-
trict, sewer district, or water district shall enact or enforce any ordi-
nance, rule, regulation, or policy that bans accessory dwelling units in any
residential zoning area within its jurisdiction. An accessory dwelling unit
shall be classified as a residential land use for zoning purposes subject to
all applicable zoning requirements. "Accessory dwelling unit" means a self-
contained living unit that includes its own cooking, sleeping, and sanita-
tion facilities and that is located on the same lot as a single-family pri-
mary dwelling. An accessory dwelling unit may be internal, attached, or de-
tached but does not include a motorhome, camper, recreational vehicle, tiny
home on wheels, or other such similar dwellings on wheels.
(2) By resolution or ordinance adopted, amended, or repealed in accor-
dance with the notice and hearing procedures provided under section 67-6509,
Idaho Code, each governing board shall amend its comprehensive plan and land
use regulations for all land zoned for single-family residential uses, ex-
cept for lands falling within an area defined as a historic district under
section 67-4607, Idaho Code, to:
(a) Allow for one (1) accessory dwelling unit on lots with a size of up
to one (1) acre and a maximum of two (2) accessory dwelling units for
lots larger than one (1) acre. Where one (1) accessory dwelling unit
is an internal accessory dwelling unit within the single-family primary
dwelling, up to two (2) accessory dwelling units shall be allowed re-
gardless of the size of the lot;
(b) Prohibit requiring any off-street parking or guest parking for any
accessory dwelling unit;
(c) Prohibit imposing impact fees or utility connection fees on acces-
sory dwelling units that are greater than those imposed on other sin-
gle-family dwellings;


(d) Prohibit limiting the size of an accessory dwelling unit to less
than one thousand (1000) square feet or seventy-five percent (75%) of
the size of the primary dwelling;
(e) Prohibit imposing a setback requirement greater than four (4) feet
from the side and rear lot lines for an accessory dwelling unit that is
not converted from an existing structure or for a new structure con-
structed in the same location and to the same dimensions as an existing
structure;
(f) Prohibit an owner-occupancy requirement for the primary dwelling
or for the accessory dwelling unit;
(g) Prohibit restrictions for accessory dwelling units that are more
restrictive than restrictions for single-family dwellings within the
same zoning area with regard to height, setbacks, lot size, or coverage
or building frontage;
(h) Prohibit imposing a limit on density that is more restrictive than
the greater of either the highest residential density allowed in the mu-
nicipality or thirty-six (36) dwelling units per acre;
(i) Prohibit imposing a limit on building height that is more restric-
tive than the greater of either the highest height applicable to an of-
fice, commercial, retail, or warehouse development constructed on the
site or forty-five (45) feet; and
(j) Prohibit imposing a setback or buffer requirement that is more
restrictive than the lesser of either a setback or buffer requirement
applicable to an office, commercial, retail, or warehouse development
constructed on the site or twenty-five (25) feet.
(3) Accessory dwelling unit projects that meet the jurisdiction's es-
tablished land use requirements shall be approved administratively and as a
matter of right, without the need for discretionary approval.
(4) Any approval standards, special conditions, and procedures for ap-
proval adopted by a local government shall be clear and objective and shall
not have the effect, either singularly or cumulatively, of discouraging the
development of accessory dwelling units through unreasonable cost or delay.
(5) A property owner, housing developer, or other affected party may
bring a private cause of action for injunctive relief, monetary damages,
reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief
available under law to enforce compliance with the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 4. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.